Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-606.02
Keno manager, defined.

Keno manager shall mean the shift manager, supervisor, or person in charge of the daily operation of a keno game at a location.

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 48.